Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 10.01 RCW to read as follows:(1) A previously imposed judgment against an offender for any costs, fees, and interest on restitution or other legal financial obligations eliminated or repealed by this act is not enforceable after the effective date of this section.Â The court shall not accept payments for such costs and fees or for any accrued interest on restitution or nonrestitution legal financial obligations after the effective date of this section. Any such debts shall be considered null and void and satisfied and paid in full. Nothing in this section shall require a clerk to take any action or alter any record except by the lawful order of a judge.(2) Nothing in this section shall prevent a court from granting individual relief at any time in response to a motion. On motion of an offender, the court shall waive all uncollectible portions of the offender's legal financial obligations, including accrued interest on restitution and nonrestitution legal financial obligations. The presiding judge of a superior court or court of limited jurisdiction may authorize an administrative process to waive outstanding debt for any uncollectible legal financial obligation, other than restitution, including accrued interest on restitution and nonrestitution legal financial obligations, imposed against an adult.(3) For the purposes of this section, the clerk of the superior court or court administrator of a court of limited jurisdiction may seek a judicial order to waive outstanding debt for costs and fees, other than restitution, and for accrued interest on restitution and nonrestitution legal financial obligations, in the same manner as the clerk is authorized to seek an extension of jurisdiction under RCW 6.17.020 for purposes of collection as allowed under RCW 36.18.190. Any motion filed by a clerk or court administrator under this section does not constitute the practice of law.Sec. 2. RCW 3.50.100 and 2018 c 269 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Costs in civil and criminal actions may be imposed as provided in district court. All fees, costs, fines, forfeitures and other money imposed by any municipal court for the violation of any municipal or town ordinances shall be collected by the court clerk and, together with any other noninterest revenues received by the clerk, shall be deposited with the city or town treasurer as a part of the general fund of the city or town, or deposited in such other fund of the city or town, or deposited in such other funds as may be designated by the laws of the state of Washington.(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the city treasurer shall remit monthly ((thirty-two))32 percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking infractions, and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions ((under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes))as specifically authorized by statute if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court ((and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel)). Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state general fund.(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, penalties, fines, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of ((twelve))12 percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.(b) As of June 7, 2018, penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs imposed against a defendant in a criminal proceeding shall not accrue interest.(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, ((bail forfeitures,)) fees, and costs imposed in civil proceedings shall be split ((twenty-five))25 percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, ((twenty-five))25 percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, ((twenty-five))25 percent to the city general fund, and ((twenty-five))25 percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.Sec. 3. RCW 3.62.020 and 2018 c 269 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in whole or in part by district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, because of the violation of city ordinances, shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court to the county treasurer at least monthly, together with a financial statement as required by the state auditor, noting the information necessary for crediting of such funds as required by law.(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120, 10.99.080, 7.84.100(((4)))(5), and this section, the county treasurer shall remit ((thirty-two))32 percent of the noninterest money received under subsection (1) of this section except certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions ((under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes))as specifically authorized by statute if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court ((and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel)). With the exception of funds to be transferred to the judicial stabilization trust account under RCW 3.62.060(2), money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state general fund.(3) The balance of the noninterest money received by the county treasurer under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in the county current expense fund. Funds deposited under this subsection that are attributable to the county's portion of a surcharge imposed under RCW 3.62.060(2) must be used to support local trial court and court-related functions.(4) Except as provided in RCW 7.84.100(((4)))(5), all money collected for county parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the information required under subsection (1) of this section, to the county treasurer for deposit in the county current expense fund.(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, penalties, fines, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.(b) As of June 7, 2018, penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs imposed against a defendant in a criminal proceeding shall not accrue interest.(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, ((bail forfeitures,)) fees, and costs imposed in civil proceedings shall be split ((twenty-five))25 percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, ((twenty-five))25 percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, ((twenty-five))25 percent to the county current expense fund, and ((twenty-five))25 percent to the county current expense fund to fund local courts.Sec. 4. RCW 3.62.040 and 2018 c 269 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, by district courts because of violations of city ordinances shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly directly to the treasurer of the city wherein the violation occurred.(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the city treasurer shall remit monthly ((thirty-two))32 percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking infractions and certain costs, to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions ((under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes))as specifically authorized by statute if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court ((and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel)). Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state general fund.(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.(4) All money collected for city parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court at least monthly to the city treasurer for deposit in the city's general fund.(5)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, penalties, fines, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of ((twelve))12 percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.(b) As of June 7, 2018, penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs imposed against a defendant in a criminal proceeding shall not accrue interest.(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, ((bail forfeitures,)) fees, and costs imposed in civil proceedings shall be split ((twenty-five))25 percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, ((twenty-five))25 percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, ((twenty-five))25 percent to the city general fund, and ((twenty-five))25 percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.Sec. 5. RCW 3.66.120 and 2022 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All court-ordered restitution obligations that are ordered as a result of a conviction for a criminal offense in a court of limited jurisdiction may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed. The judgment and sentence must identify the party or entity to whom restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the judgment.(2) At any time, including at sentencing, the court ((may))shall determine that the offender is not required to pay, or ((may))shall relieve the offender of the requirement to pay, full or partial restitution ((and accrued interest on restitution)) where the entity to whom restitution is owed is an insurer or state agency, except for restitution owed to the department of labor and industries under chapter 7.68 RCW, if the court finds that the offender does not have the current ((or likely future)) ability to pay. A person does not have the current ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms "insurer" and "state agency" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 9.94A.750(3).(3) All court-ordered restitution obligations may be enforced at any time during the 10-year period following the offender's release from total confinement or within 10 years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. Prior to the expiration of the initial 10-year period, the court may extend the criminal judgment an additional 10 years for payment of court-ordered restitution only if the court finds that the offender has not made a good faith attempt to pay.(4) The party or entity to whom the court-ordered restitution obligation is owed may utilize any other remedies available to the party or entity to collect the court-ordered financial obligation.(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to deprive the court of the authority to determine whether the offender's failure to pay the legal financial obligation constitutes a violation of a condition of probation or to impose a sanction upon the offender if such a violation is found.Sec. 6. RCW 6.17.020 and 2022 c 260 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the party in whose favor a judgment of a court has been or may be filed or rendered, or the assignee or the current holder thereof, may have an execution, garnishment, or other legal process issued for the collection or enforcement of the judgment at any time within 10 years from entry of the judgment or the filing of the judgment in this state.(2) After July 23, 1989, a party who obtains a judgment or order of a court or an administrative order entered as defined in RCW 74.20A.020(6) for accrued child support, or the assignee or the current holder thereof, may have an execution, garnishment, or other legal process issued upon that judgment or order at any time within 10 years of the 18th birthday of the youngest child named in the order for whom support is ordered.(3) After June 9, 1994, a party in whose favor a judgment has been filed as a foreign judgment or rendered pursuant to subsection (1) or (4) of this section, or the assignee or the current holder thereof, may, within 90 days before the expiration of the original 10-year period, apply to the court that rendered the judgment or to the court where the judgment was filed as a foreign judgment for an order granting an additional 10 years during which an execution, garnishment, or other legal process may be issued. If a district court judgment of this state is transcribed to a superior court of this state, the original district court judgment shall not be extended and any petition under this section to extend the judgment that has been transcribed to superior court shall be filed in the superior court within 90 days before the expiration of the 10-year period of the date the transcript of the district court judgment was filed in the superior court of this state. The petitioner shall pay to the court a filing fee equal to the filing fee for filing the first or initial paper in a civil action in the court, except in the case of district court judgments transcribed to superior court, where the filing fee shall be the fee for filing the first or initial paper in a civil action in the superior court where the judgment was transcribed. The order granting the application shall contain an updated judgment summary as provided in RCW 4.64.030. The filing fee required under this subsection shall be included in the judgment summary and shall be a recoverable cost. The application shall be granted as a matter of right, subject to review only for timeliness, factual issues of full or partial satisfaction, or errors in calculating the judgment summary amounts.(4)(a) A party who obtains a judgment or order for restitution pursuant to a criminal judgment and sentence, or the assignee or the current holder thereof, may execute, garnish, and/or have legal process issued upon the judgment or order any time within 10 years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence or 10 years following the offender's release from total confinement as provided in chapter 9.94A RCW. The clerk of (([the]))the superior court, or a party designated by the clerk, may seek extension under subsection (3) of this section for purposes of collection as allowed under RCW 36.18.190, provided that no filing fee shall be required.(b) A party who obtains a judgment or order for court-ordered legal financial obligations other than restitution, pursuant to a criminal judgment and sentence, or the assignee or the current holder thereof, may execute, garnish, and have legal process issued upon the judgment or order any time within 10 years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence or 10 years following the offender's release from total confinement as provided in chapter 9.94A RCW. The clerk of (([the]))the superior court, or a party designated by the clerk, may seek extension under subsection (3) of this section for purposes of collection as allowed under RCW 36.18.190, only if the court finds that the offender has the current ((or likely future)) ability to pay the nonrestitution legal financial obligations. A person does not have the current ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act. No filing fee shall be required for filing a petition for an extension pursuant to this subsection (4)(b).(5) "Court" as used in this section includes but is not limited to the United States supreme court, the United States courts of appeals, the United States district courts, the United States bankruptcy courts, the Washington state supreme court, the court of appeals of the state of Washington, superior courts and district courts of the counties of the state of Washington, and courts of other states and jurisdictions from which judgment has been filed in this state under chapter 6.36 or 6.40 RCW.(6) The perfection of any judgment lien and the priority of that judgment lien on property as established by RCW 6.13.090 and chapter 4.56 RCW is not altered by the extension of the judgment pursuant to the provisions of this section and the lien remains in full force and effect and does not have to be rerecorded after it is extended. Continued perfection of a judgment that has been transcribed to other counties and perfected in those counties may be accomplished after extension of the judgment by filing with the clerk of the other counties where the judgment has been filed either a certified copy of the order extending the judgment or a certified copy of the docket of the matter where the judgment was extended.(7) Except as ordered in RCW 4.16.020 (2) or (3), chapter 9.94A RCW, or chapter 13.40 RCW, no judgment is enforceable for a period exceeding 20 years from the date of entry in the originating court. Nothing in this section may be interpreted to extend the expiration date of a foreign judgment beyond the expiration date under the laws of the jurisdiction where the judgment originated.(8) The chapter 261, Laws of 2002 amendments to this section apply to all judgments currently in effect on June 13, 2002, to all judgments extended after June 9, 1994, unless the judgment has been satisfied, vacated, and/or quashed, and to all judgments filed or rendered, or both, after June 13, 2002.Sec. 7. RCW 9.92.060 and 2023 c 449 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever any person is convicted of any crime except murder, burglary in the first degree, arson in the first degree, robbery, rape of a child, or rape, the superior court may, in its discretion, at the time of imposing sentence upon such person, direct that such sentence be stayed and suspended until otherwise ordered by the superior court, and, upon such terms as the superior court may determine, that the sentenced person be placed under the charge of:(a) A community corrections officer employed by the department of corrections, if the person is subject to supervision under RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011; or(b) A probation officer employed or contracted for by the county, if the county has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers.(2) As a condition to suspension of sentence, the superior court may require the convicted person to make such monetary payments, on such terms as the superior court deems appropriate under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay any fine imposed and not suspended ((and))by the court or other costs ((incurred in the prosecution of the case))specifically authorized by statute, including reimbursement of the state for costs of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; and (d) to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund.(3) At any time, including at sentencing, the court ((may))shall determine that the offender is not required to pay, or ((may))shall relieve the offender of the requirement to pay, full or partial restitution ((and accrued interest on restitution)) where the entity to whom restitution is owed is an insurer or a state agency, except for restitution owed to the department of labor and industries under chapter 7.68 RCW, if the court finds that the offender does not have the current ((or likely future)) ability to pay. A person does not have the current ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms "insurer" and "state agency" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 9.94A.750(3).(4) As a condition of the suspended sentence, the superior court may order the probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county legislative authority has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers within its jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but resides within another county, there must be provisions for the probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility for the probationer's county of residence.(5) If restitution to the victim has been ordered under subsection (2)(b) of this section and the superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether restitution has been made as ordered. If the superior court has ordered supervision and restitution has not been made, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of the suspended sentence not less than three months prior to the termination of the suspended sentence.Sec. 8. RCW 9.94A.725 and 2000 c 28 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:Participation in a work crew is conditioned upon the offender's acceptance into the program, abstinence from alcohol and controlled substances as demonstrated by urinalysis and breathalyzer monitoring, ((with the cost of monitoring to be paid by the offender, unless indigent;)) and ((upon)) compliance with the rules of the program, which rules require the offender to work to the best of his or her abilities and provide the program with accurate, verified residence information. Work crew may be imposed simultaneously with electronic home detention.Where work crew is imposed as part of a sentence of nine months or more, the offender must serve a minimum of thirty days of total confinement before being eligible for work crew.Work crew tasks shall be performed for a minimum of thirty-five hours per week. Only those offenders sentenced to a facility operated or utilized under contract by a county or the state, or sanctioned under RCW 9.94A.737, are eligible to participate on a work crew. Offenders sentenced for a sex offense are not eligible for the work crew program.An offender who has successfully completed four weeks of work crew at thirty-five hours per week shall thereafter receive credit toward the work crew sentence for hours worked at approved, verified employment. Such employment credit may be earned for up to twenty-four hours actual employment per week provided, however, that every such offender shall continue active participation in work crew projects according to a schedule approved by a work crew supervisor until the work crew sentence has been served.The hours served as part of a work crew sentence may include substance abuse counseling and/or job skills training.The civic improvement tasks performed by offenders on work crew shall be unskilled labor for the benefit of the community as determined by the head of the county executive branch or his or her designee. Civic improvement tasks shall not be done on private property unless it is owned or operated by a nonprofit entity, except that, for emergency purposes only, work crews may perform snow removal on any private property. The civic improvement tasks shall have minimal negative impact on existing private industries or the labor force in the county where the service or labor is performed. The civic improvement tasks shall not affect employment opportunities for people with developmental disabilities contracted through sheltered workshops as defined in RCW 82.04.385. In case any dispute arises as to a civic improvement task having more than minimum negative impact on existing private industries or labor force in the county where their service or labor is performed, the matter shall be referred by an interested party, as defined in RCW 39.12.010(4), for arbitration to the director of the department of labor and industries of the state.((Whenever an offender receives credit against a work crew sentence for hours of approved, verified employment, the offender shall pay to the agency administering the program the monthly assessment of an amount not less than ten dollars per month nor more than fifty dollars per month. This assessment shall be considered payment of the costs of providing the work crew program to an offender. The court may exempt a person from the payment of all or any part of the assessment based upon any of the following factors:(1) The offender has diligently attempted but has been unable to obtain employment that provides the offender sufficient income to make such payment.(2) The offender is a student in a school, college, university, or a course of vocational or technical training designed to fit the student for gainful employment.(3) The offender has an employment handicap, as determined by an examination acceptable to or ordered by the court.(4) The offender is responsible for the support of dependents and the payment of the assessment constitutes an undue hardship.(5) Other extenuating circumstances as determined by the court.))No fees or assessments shall be charged to an offender for participation in a work crew or for the costs of urinalysis and breathalyzer monitoring.Sec. 9. RCW 9.94A.750 and 2022 c 260 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:This section applies to offenses committed on or before July 1, 1985.(1) If restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the amount of restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within 180 days. The court may continue the hearing beyond the 180 days for good cause. The court shall then set a minimum monthly payment that the offender is required to make towards the restitution that is ordered. The court shall not issue any order that postpones the commencement of restitution payments until after the offender is released from total confinement. The court should take into consideration the total amount of the restitution owed, the offender's ((present, past, and future))current ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may have. An offender's inability to make restitution payments while in total confinement may not be the basis for a violation of his or her sentence unless his or her inability to make payments resulted from a refusal to accept an employment offer to a class I or class II job or a termination for cause from such a job.(2) During the period of supervision, the community corrections officer may examine the offender to determine if there has been a change in circumstances that warrants an amendment of the monthly payment schedule. The community corrections officer may recommend a change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of the recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing court may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report from the community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a criminal conviction shall be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to persons, and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling reasonably related to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not exceed double the amount of the offender's gain or the victim's loss from the commission of the offense.(b) At any time, including at sentencing, the court ((may))shall determine that the offender is not required to pay, or ((may))shall relieve the offender of the requirement to pay, full or partial restitution ((and accrued interest on restitution)) where the entity to whom restitution is owed is an insurer or state agency, except for restitution owed to the department of labor and industries under chapter 7.68 RCW, if the court finds that the offender does not have the current ((or likely future)) ability to pay. A person does not have the current ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act. For the purposes of this subsection:(i) "Insurer" means any insurer as defined and authorized under Title 48 RCW. "Insurer" does not include an individual self-insurance program or joint self-insurance program.(ii) "Self-insurance" means a formal program of advance funding and management of entity financial exposure to a risk of loss that is not transferred through the purchase of an insurance policy or contract.(iii) "State agency" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 42.56.010(1).(4) For the purposes of this section, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a term of 10 years following the offender's release from total confinement or 10 years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. Prior to the expiration of the initial 10-year period, the superior court may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional 10 years for payment of restitution. The portion of the sentence concerning restitution may be modified as to amount, terms and conditions during either the initial 10-year period or subsequent 10-year period if the criminal judgment is extended, regardless of the expiration of the offender's term of community supervision and regardless of the statutory maximum sentence for the crime. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution shall be supervised by the department only during any period which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is in confinement in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such period. The department is responsible for supervision of the offender only during confinement and authorized supervision and not during any subsequent period in which the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid restitution at any time the offender remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her legal financial obligations.(5) Restitution may be ordered whenever the offender is convicted of an offense which results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property or as provided in subsection (6) of this section. In addition, restitution may be ordered to pay for an injury, loss, or damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.(6) Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall include: (a) All of the victim's medical expenses that are associated with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b) child support for any child born as a result of the rape if child support is ordered pursuant to a proceeding in superior court or administrative order for support for that child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made on behalf of the victim's child to the Washington state child support registry under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the victim and child shall not be included in the order. The offender shall receive a credit against any obligation owing under the administrative or superior court order for support of the victim's child. For the purposes of this subsection, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until the offender has satisfied support obligations under the superior court or administrative order but not longer than a maximum term of 25 years following the offender's release from total confinement or 25 years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total amount. The department shall supervise the offender's compliance with the restitution ordered under this subsection.(7) In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, an offender who has been found guilty of an offense involving fraud or other deceptive practice or an organization which has been found guilty of any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing court to give notice of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector of the public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.(8) This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses available to the victim or offender including support enforcement remedies for support ordered under subsection (6) of this section for a child born as a result of a rape of a child victim. The court shall identify in the judgment and sentence the victim or victims entitled to restitution and what amount is due each victim. The state or victim may enforce the court-ordered restitution in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.Sec. 10. RCW 9.94A.753 and 2022 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:This section applies to offenses committed after July 1, 1985.(1) When restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the amount of restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within 180 days except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. The court may continue the hearing beyond the 180 days for good cause. The court shall then set a minimum monthly payment that the offender is required to make towards the restitution that is ordered. The court shall not issue any order that postpones the commencement of restitution payments until after the offender is released from total confinement. The court should take into consideration the total amount of the restitution owed, the offender's ((present, past, and future))current ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may have. An offender's inability to make restitution payments while in total confinement may not be the basis for a violation of his or her sentence unless his or her inability to make payments resulted from a refusal to accept an employment offer to a class I or class II job or a termination for cause from such a job.(2) During the period of supervision, the community corrections officer may examine the offender to determine if there has been a change in circumstances that warrants an amendment of the monthly payment schedule. The community corrections officer may recommend a change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of the recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing court may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report from the community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a criminal conviction shall be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to persons, and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling reasonably related to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not exceed double the amount of the offender's gain or the victim's loss from the commission of the crime.(b) At any time, including at sentencing, the court ((may))shall determine that the offender is not required to pay, or ((may))shall relieve the offender of the requirement to pay, full or partial restitution ((and accrued interest on restitution)) where the entity to whom restitution is owed is an insurer or state agency, except for restitution owed to the department of labor and industries under chapter 7.68 RCW, if the court finds that the offender does not have the current ((or likely future)) ability to pay. A person does not have the current ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms "insurer" and "state agency" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 9.94A.750(3).(4) For the purposes of this section, for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2000, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a term of 10 years following the offender's release from total confinement or 10 years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends later. Prior to the expiration of the initial 10-year period, the superior court may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional 10 years for payment of restitution. For an offense committed on or after July 1, 2000, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until the obligation is completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the crime. The portion of the sentence concerning restitution may be modified as to amount, terms, and conditions during any period of time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction, regardless of the expiration of the offender's term of community supervision and regardless of the statutory maximum sentence for the crime. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution shall be supervised by the department only during any period which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is in confinement in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such period. The department is responsible for supervision of the offender only during confinement and authorized supervision and not during any subsequent period in which the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid restitution at any time the offender remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her legal financial obligations.(5) Restitution shall be ordered whenever the offender is convicted of an offense which results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property or as provided in subsection (6) of this section unless extraordinary circumstances exist which make restitution inappropriate in the court's judgment and the court sets forth such circumstances in the record. In addition, restitution shall be ordered to pay for an injury, loss, or damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.(6) Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall include: (a) All of the victim's medical expenses that are associated with the rape and resulting pregnancy; and (b) child support for any child born as a result of the rape if child support is ordered pursuant to a civil superior court or administrative order for support for that child. The clerk must forward any restitution payments made on behalf of the victim's child to the Washington state child support registry under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the victim and child shall not be included in the order. The offender shall receive a credit against any obligation owing under the administrative or superior court order for support of the victim's child. For the purposes of this subsection, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until the offender has satisfied support obligations under the superior court or administrative order for the period provided in RCW 4.16.020 or a maximum term of 25 years following the offender's release from total confinement or 25 years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total amount. The department shall supervise the offender's compliance with the restitution ordered under this subsection.(7) Regardless of the provisions of subsections (1) through (6) of this section, the court shall order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the court does not order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime victims' compensation program, may petition the court within one year of entry of the judgment and sentence for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of a petition from the department of labor and industries, the court shall hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution order.(8) In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, an offender who has been found guilty of an offense involving fraud or other deceptive practice or an organization which has been found guilty of any such offense may be ordered by the sentencing court to give notice of the conviction to the class of persons or to the sector of the public affected by the conviction or financially interested in the subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.(9) This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses available to the victim, survivors of the victim, or offender including support enforcement remedies for support ordered under subsection (6) of this section for a child born as a result of a rape of a child victim. The court shall identify in the judgment and sentence the victim or victims entitled to restitution and what amount is due each victim. The state or victim may enforce the court-ordered restitution in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim.(10) If a person has caused a victim to lose money or property through the filing of a vehicle report of sale in which the designated buyer had no knowledge of the vehicle transfer or the fraudulent filing of the report of sale, upon conviction or when the offender pleads guilty and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim, the court may order the defendant to pay an amount, fixed by the court, not to exceed double the amount of the defendant's gain or victim's loss from the filing of the vehicle report of sale in which the designated buyer had no knowledge of the vehicle transfer or the fraudulent filing of the report of sale. Such an amount may be used to provide restitution to the victim at the order of the court. It is the duty of the prosecuting attorney to investigate the alternative of restitution, and to recommend it to the court, when the prosecuting attorney believes that restitution is appropriate and feasible. If the court orders restitution, the court must make a finding as to the amount of the victim's loss due to the filing of the report of sale in which the designated buyer had no knowledge of the vehicle transfer or the fraudulent filing of the report of sale, and if the record does not contain sufficient evidence to support such finding, the court may conduct a hearing upon the issue. For purposes of this section, "loss" refers to the amount of money or the value of property or services lost.Sec. 11. RCW 9.94A.760 and 2023 c 449 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Whenever a person is convicted in superior court, the court may order the payment of a legal financial obligation as part of the sentence. The court may not order an offender to pay costs ((as described in RCW 10.01.160 if the court finds that the offender at the time of sentencing is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3)))except as specifically authorized by statute. An offender being indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act is not grounds for failing to impose restitution, subject to RCW 9.94A.750(3) and 9.94A.753(3). The court must on either the judgment and sentence or on a subsequent order to pay, designate the total amount of a legal financial obligation and segregate this amount among the separate assessments made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments required by law. On the same order, the court is also to set a sum that the offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards satisfying the legal financial obligation. If the court fails to set the offender monthly payment amount, the department shall set the amount if the department has active supervision of the offender, otherwise the county clerk shall set the amount.(2) Upon receipt of each payment made by or on behalf of an offender, the county clerk shall distribute the payment in the following order of priority until satisfied:(a) First, proportionally to restitution to victims that have not been fully compensated from other sources;(b) Second, proportionally to restitution to insurance or other sources with respect to a loss that has provided compensation to victims;(c) Third, proportionally to crime victims' assessments that have not been waived under RCW 7.68.035; and(d) Fourth, proportionally to costs, fines, and other assessments required by law.(3) ((If the court determines that the offender, at the time of sentencing, has the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the court may require the offender to pay for the cost of incarceration. The court shall not order the offender to pay the cost of incarceration if the court finds that the offender at the time of sentencing is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3). Costs of incarceration ordered by the court shall not exceed a rate of $50 per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a prison, or the actual cost of incarceration per day of incarceration, if incarcerated in a county jail. In no case may the court require the offender to pay more than $100 per day for the cost of incarceration. All funds recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the county jail shall be remitted to the county and the costs of incarceration in a prison shall be remitted to the department.(4))) The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be issued immediately. If the court chooses not to order the immediate issuance of a notice of payroll deduction at sentencing, the court shall add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice to the offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount payable for one month is owed.If a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not include the statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal financial obligation payment is past due, the department or the county clerk may serve a notice on the offender stating such requirements and authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.(((5)))(4)(a) Independent of the department or the county clerk, the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the authority to use any other remedies available to the party or entity to collect the legal financial obligation. These remedies include enforcement in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed. Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there is more than one victim. The judgment and sentence shall identify the party or entity to whom restitution is owed so that the state, party, or entity may enforce the judgment.(b) If restitution is ordered pursuant to RCW 9.94A.750(6) or 9.94A.753(6) to a victim of rape of a child or a victim's child born from the rape, the Washington state child support registry shall be identified as the party to whom payments must be made. Restitution obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second, or third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced for the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.750(6) and 9.94A.753(6).(c) All other restitution obligations for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time during the 10-year period following the offender's release from total confinement or within 10 years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends later. Prior to the expiration of the initial 10-year period, the superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional 10 years for payment of restitution obligations. All other restitution obligations for an offense committed on or after July 1, 2000, may be enforced at any time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. For an offense committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall retain jurisdiction over the offender, for purposes of the offender's compliance with payment of the restitution obligations, until the obligation is completely satisfied, regardless of the statutory maximum for the crime.(d) All other legal financial obligations other than restitution may be enforced at any time during the 10-year period following the offender's release from total confinement or within 10 years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period ends later. Prior to the expiration of the initial 10-year period, the superior court may extend the criminal judgment an additional 10 years for payment of nonrestitution legal financial obligations only if the court finds that the offender has the current ((or likely future)) ability to pay the obligations. A person does not have the current ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act.(e) The department may only supervise the offender's compliance with payment of the legal financial obligations during any period in which the department is authorized to supervise the offender in the community under RCW 9.94A.728, 9.94A.501, or in which the offender is confined in a state correctional institution or a correctional facility pursuant to a transfer agreement with the department, and the department shall supervise the offender's compliance during any such period. The department is not responsible for supervision of the offender during any subsequent period of time the offender remains under the court's jurisdiction. The county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid legal financial obligations at any time the offender remains under the jurisdiction of the court for purposes of his or her legal financial obligations.(((6)))(5) In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the offender must pay during the period of supervision, the offender is required to report to the department for purposes of preparing a recommendation to the court. When reporting, the offender is required, under oath, to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning present, past, and future earning capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender is further required to bring all documents requested by the department.(((7)))(6) After completing the investigation, the department shall make a report to the court on the amount of the monthly payment that the offender should be required to make towards a satisfied legal financial obligation.(((8)))(7)(a) During the period of supervision, the department may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial circumstances. If the department sets the monthly payment amount, the department may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter being returned to the court. During the period of supervision, the department may require the offender to report to the department for the purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring all documents requested by the department in order to prepare the collection schedule.(b) Subsequent to any period of supervision, or if the department is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the county clerk may make a recommendation to the court that the offender's monthly payment schedule be modified so as to reflect a change in financial circumstances. If the county clerk sets the monthly payment amount, or if the department set the monthly payment amount and the department has subsequently turned the collection of the legal financial obligation over to the county clerk, the clerk may modify the monthly payment amount without the matter being returned to the court. During the period of repayment, the county clerk may require the offender to report to the clerk for the purpose of reviewing the appropriateness of the collection schedule for the legal financial obligation. During this reporting, the offender is required under oath to respond truthfully and honestly to all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial assets. The offender shall bring all documents requested by the county clerk in order to prepare the collection schedule.(((9)))(8) After the judgment and sentence or payment order is entered, the department is authorized, for any period of supervision, to collect the legal financial obligation from the offender. Subsequent to any period of supervision or, if the department is not authorized to supervise the offender in the community, the county clerk is authorized to collect unpaid legal financial obligations from the offender. Any amount collected by the department shall be remitted daily to the county clerk for the purpose of disbursements. The department and the county clerks are authorized, but not required, to accept credit cards as payment for a legal financial obligation((, and any costs incurred related to accepting credit card payments shall be the responsibility of the offender)).(((10)))(9) The department or any obligee of the legal financial obligation may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of obtaining satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW 9.94A.7701. Any party obtaining a wage assignment shall notify the county clerk. The county clerks shall notify the department, or the administrative office of the courts, whichever is providing the monthly billing for the offender.(((11)))(10) The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a legal financial obligation constitutes a condition or requirement of a sentence and the offender is subject to the penalties for noncompliance as provided in RCW 9.94B.040, 9.94A.737, or 9.94A.740. If the court determines that the offender is homeless or a person who is mentally ill, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, failure to pay a legal financial obligation is not willful noncompliance and shall not subject the offender to penalties.(((12)))(11)(a) The administrative office of the courts shall mail individualized periodic billings to the address known by the office for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation.(b) The billing shall direct payments to the county clerk.(c) The county clerk shall provide the administrative office of the courts with notice of payments by such offenders no less frequently than weekly.(d) The county clerks, the administrative office of the courts, and the department shall maintain agreements to implement this subsection.(((13)))(12) The department shall arrange for the collection of unpaid legal financial obligations during any period of supervision in the community through the county clerk. The department shall either collect unpaid legal financial obligations or arrange for collections through another entity if the clerk does not assume responsibility or is unable to continue to assume responsibility for collection pursuant to subsection (((5)))(4) of this section. The costs for collection services shall be paid by the offender.(((14)))(13) The county clerk may access the records of the employment security department for the purposes of verifying employment or income, seeking any assignment of wages, or performing other duties necessary to the collection of an offender's legal financial obligations.(((15)))(14) Nothing in this chapter makes the department, the state, the counties, or any state or county employees, agents, or other persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment of these legal financial obligations or for the acts of any offender who is no longer, or was not, subject to supervision by the department for a term of community custody, and who remains under the jurisdiction of the court for payment of legal financial obligations.Sec. 12. RCW 9.95.210 and 2023 c 449 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection in granting probation, the superior court may suspend the imposition or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension may continue upon such conditions and for such time as it shall designate, not exceeding the maximum term of sentence or two years, whichever is longer.(b) For a defendant sentenced for a domestic violence offense, or under RCW 46.61.5055, the superior court may suspend the imposition or the execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension continue upon such conditions and for such time as the court shall designate, not to exceed five years. The court shall have continuing jurisdiction and authority to suspend the execution of all or any part of the sentence upon stated terms, including installment payment of fines. A defendant who has been sentenced, and who then fails to appear for any hearing to address the defendant's compliance with the terms of probation when ordered to do so by the court shall have the term of probation tolled until such time as the defendant makes his or her presence known to the court on the record. Any time before entering an order terminating probation, the court may modify or revoke its order suspending the imposition or execution of the sentence if the defendant violates or fails to carry out any of the conditions of the suspended sentence.(2) In the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, the superior court may in its discretion imprison the defendant in the county jail for a period not exceeding one year and may fine the defendant any sum not exceeding the statutory limit for the offense committed, and court costs specifically authorized by statute. As a condition of probation, the superior court may require the defendant to make such monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as may be imposed and court costs specifically authorized by statute, including reimbursement of the state for costs of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; (d) ((following consideration of the financial condition of the person subject to possible electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of electronic monitoring if that monitoring was required by the court as a condition of release from custody or as a condition of probation; (e))) to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund; and (((f)))(e) to make restitution to a public agency for the costs of an emergency response under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for the faithful observance of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.(3) The superior court shall order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the superior court does not order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime victims' compensation program, may petition the superior court within one year of imposition of the sentence for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of a petition from the department of labor and industries, the superior court shall hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution order.(4) At any time, including at sentencing, the court ((may))shall determine that the offender is not required to pay, or ((may))shall relieve the offender of the requirement to pay, full or partial restitution ((and accrued interest on restitution)) where the entity to whom restitution is owed is an insurer or a state agency, except for restitution owed to the department of labor and industries under chapter 7.68 RCW, if the court finds that the offender does not have the current ((or likely future)) ability to pay. A person does not have the current ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act. For the purposes of this subsection, the terms "insurer" and "state agency" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 9.94A.750(3).(5) In granting probation, the superior court may order the probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to follow the instructions of the secretary for up to twelve months. If the county legislative authority has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers within its jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but resides within another county, there must be provisions for the probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility for the probationer's county of residence.(6) If the probationer has been ordered to make restitution and the superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether restitution has been made. If the superior court has ordered supervision and restitution has not been made as ordered, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of probation not less than three months prior to the termination of the probation period. The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and regulations for the conduct of the person during the term of probation. For defendants found guilty in district court, like functions as the secretary performs in regard to probation may be performed by probation officers employed for that purpose by the county legislative authority of the county wherein the court is located.(7) The provisions of RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011 apply to sentences imposed under this section.(8) For purposes of this section, "domestic violence" means the same as in RCW 10.99.020.Sec. 13. RCW 10.01.160 and 2022 c 260 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the court may require a defendant to pay costs. Costs may be imposed only upon a convicted defendant, except for costs imposed upon a defendant's entry into a deferred prosecution program, costs imposed upon a defendant for pretrial supervision, or costs imposed upon a defendant for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear.(2) Costs shall be limited to expenses specially incurred by the state in prosecuting the defendant or in administering the deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW or pretrial supervision. They cannot include expenses inherent in providing a constitutionally guaranteed jury trial or expenditures in connection with the maintenance and operation of government agencies that must be made by the public irrespective of specific violations of law. Expenses incurred for serving of warrants for failure to appear and jury fees under RCW 10.46.190 may be included in costs the court may require a defendant to pay. Costs for administering a deferred prosecution may not exceed $250. Costs for administering a pretrial supervision other than a pretrial electronic alcohol monitoring program, drug monitoring program, or 24/7 sobriety program may not exceed $150. Costs for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear may not exceed $100. Costs of incarceration imposed on a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor may not exceed the actual cost of incarceration. In no case may the court require the offender to pay more than $100 per day for the cost of incarceration. Payment of other court-ordered financial obligations, including all legal financial obligations and costs of supervision take precedence over the payment of the cost of incarceration ordered by the court. All funds received from defendants for the cost of incarceration in the county or city jail must be remitted for criminal justice purposes to the county or city that is responsible for the defendant's jail costs. Costs imposed constitute a judgment against a defendant and survive a dismissal of the underlying action against the defendant. However, if the defendant is acquitted on the underlying action, the costs for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear do not survive the acquittal, and the judgment that such costs would otherwise constitute shall be vacated.(3) The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs if the defendant at the time of sentencing is indigent. In determining the amount and method of payment of costs for defendants who are not indigent, the court shall take account of the financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that payment of costs will impose. For the purposes of this section, a defendant is "indigent" if the defendant: (a) Meets the criteria defined in RCW 10.101.010(3) (a) through (c); (b) is homeless or mentally ill as defined in RCW 71.24.025; (c) has household income above 125 percent of the federal poverty guidelines and has recurring basic living costs, as defined in RCW 10.101.010, that render the defendant without the financial ability to pay; or (d) has other compelling circumstances that exist that demonstrate an inability to pay.(4) A defendant who has been ordered to pay costs and who has not willfully failed to pay the obligation, as described in RCW 9.94A.6333, 9.94B.040, and 10.01.180, may at any time petition the sentencing court for remission of the payment of costs or of any unpaid portion thereof. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on the defendant or the defendant's immediate family, the court may remit all or part of the amount due in costs, modify the method of payment under RCW 10.01.170, or convert the unpaid costs to community restitution hours, if the jurisdiction operates a community restitution program, at the rate of no less than the state minimum wage established in RCW 49.46.020 for each hour of community restitution. Manifest hardship exists where the defendant is indigent as defined in subsection (3) of this section.(5) Except for direct costs relating to evaluating and reporting to the court, prosecutor, or defense counsel regarding a defendant's competency to stand trial as provided in RCW 10.77.060, this))The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs except as specifically authorized by statute. "Costs" means any amount, whether designated a fee, assessment, or cost, that is imposed for the costs associated with a defendant's arrest, prosecution, detention, or supervision in connection with a criminal offense.(2) This section shall not apply to costs related to medical or mental health treatment or services a defendant receives while in custody of the secretary of the department of social and health services or other governmental units. This section shall not prevent the secretary of the department of social and health services or other governmental units from imposing liability and seeking reimbursement from a defendant committed to an appropriate facility as provided in RCW 10.77.635 while criminal proceedings are stayed. This section shall also not prevent governmental units from imposing liability on defendants for costs related to providing medical or mental health treatment while the defendant is in the governmental unit's custody. Medical or mental health treatment and services a defendant receives at a state hospital or other facility are not a cost of prosecution and shall be recoverable under RCW 10.77.129 and 70.48.130, chapter 43.20B RCW, and any other applicable statute.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 14. A new section is added to chapter 10.01 RCW to read as follows:For the purposes of this chapter, a defendant is "indigent" if the defendant: (1) Meets the criteria defined in RCW 10.101.010(3) (a) or (b); (2) is homeless or mentally ill as defined in RCW 71.24.025; (3) has household income of 200 percent or less of the federal poverty level; (4) has household income above 200 percent of the federal poverty levels and has recurring basic living costs, as defined in RCW 10.101.010, that render the defendant without the financial ability to pay; or (5) has other compelling circumstances that exist that demonstrate an inability to pay.Sec. 15. RCW 10.01.170 and 2022 c 260 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When a defendant is sentenced to pay fines, penalties, assessments, fees, restitution, or costs, the court may grant permission for payment to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments. If the court finds that the defendant is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act, the court shall grant permission for payment to be made within a specified period of time or in specified installments. If no such permission is included in the sentence the fine or costs shall be payable forthwith.(2) An offender's monthly payment shall be applied in the following order of priority until satisfied:(a) First, proportionally to restitution to victims that have not been fully compensated from other sources;(b) Second, proportionally to restitution to insurance or other sources with respect to a loss that has provided compensation to victims;(c) Third, proportionally to crime victims' assessments; and(d) Fourth, proportionally to costs, fines, and other assessments required by law.(3) No additional fee, penalty, or assessment may be charged for a defendant to pay legal financial obligations over a period of time or in installments.Sec. 16. RCW 10.01.185 and 2022 c 260 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:A defendant who has been ordered to pay fines and who has not willfully failed to pay the obligation, as described in RCW 9.94A.6333, 9.94B.040, and 10.01.180, may at any time petition the sentencing court for remission of the payment of fines or of any unpaid portion thereof. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on the defendant or the defendant's immediate family, the court ((may))shall remit all or part of the amount due in fines, modify the method of payment under RCW 10.01.170, or convert the unpaid amounts to community restitution hours, if the jurisdiction operates a community restitution program, at the rate of no less than the state minimum wage established in RCW 49.46.020 for each hour of community restitution. Manifest hardship exists where the defendant is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act.Sec. 17. RCW 10.05.140 and 2024 c 306 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the court shall order that the petitioner shall not operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways without a valid operator's license and proof of liability insurance. The amount of liability insurance shall be established by the court at not less than that established by RCW 46.29.490. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition on any substance use disorder-based case, the court shall also order the installation of an ignition interlock under RCW 46.20.720. The required periods of use of the interlock shall be not less than the periods provided for in RCW 46.20.720. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the court may order the petitioner to make restitution ((and)). The court may not order the petitioner to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160 except as specifically authorized by statute. To help ensure continued sobriety and reduce the likelihood of reoffense, the court may order reasonable conditions during the period of the deferred prosecution including, but not limited to, attendance at self-help recovery support groups for substance use disorder, complete abstinence from alcohol and all nonprescribed mind-altering drugs, periodic urinalysis or breath analysis, and maintaining law-abiding behavior. The court may terminate the deferred prosecution upon violation of the deferred prosecution order.(2) As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition for a case involving a domestic violence behavior problem:(a) The court shall order the petitioner not to possess firearms and order the petitioner to surrender firearms under RCW 9.41.800; and(b) The court may order the petitioner to make restitution ((and)). The court may not order the petitioner to pay costs as defined in RCW 10.01.160 except as specifically authorized by statute. In addition, to help ensure continued sobriety and reduce the likelihood of reoffense in co-occurring domestic violence and substance use disorder or mental health disorder cases, the court may order reasonable conditions during the period of the deferred prosecution including, but not limited to, attendance at self-help recovery support groups for substance use disorder, complete abstinence from alcohol and all nonprescribed mind-altering drugs, periodic urinalysis or breath analysis, and maintaining law-abiding behavior. The court may terminate the deferred prosecution upon violation of the deferred prosecution order.Sec. 18. RCW 10.05.170 and 2024 c 306 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:As a condition of granting deferred prosecution, the court may order supervision of the petitioner during the period of deferral ((and may levy a monthly assessment upon the petitioner as provided in RCW 10.64.120)). The court may not charge a fee or assessment in connection with the deferred prosecution. In a jurisdiction with a probation department, the court may appoint the probation department to supervise the petitioner. In a jurisdiction without a probation department, the court may appoint an appropriate person or agency to supervise the petitioner. A supervisor appointed under this section shall be required to do at least the following:(1) If the charge for which deferral is granted relates to operation of a motor vehicle, at least once every three months request an abstract of the petitioner's driving record;(2) At least once every month make contact with the petitioner until treatment is completed;(3) Review the petitioner's criminal history at a minimum of every 90 days until the end of the deferral period; and(4) Report known violations of supervision or law and noncompliance with conditions of the deferred prosecution to the court within five business days or as soon as practicable.Sec. 19. RCW 10.64.015 and 2022 c 260 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:When the defendant is found guilty, the court shall render judgment accordingly((, and the defendant may be liable for all costs, unless the court or jury trying the cause expressly find otherwise)). The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs, as ((described))defined in RCW 10.01.160, except as specifically authorized by statute. The court shall not order a defendant to pay costs if the court finds that the person at the time of sentencing is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act.Sec. 20. RCW 10.64.120 and 2021 c 41 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((Every judge of a court of limited jurisdiction shall have the authority to levy upon a person a monthly assessment not to exceed one hundred dollars for services provided whenever the person is referred by the court to the misdemeanant probation department for evaluation or supervision services. The assessment may also be made by a judge in superior court when such misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor cases are heard in the superior court. Nothing in this subsection prevents contracting jurisdictions under RCW 39.34.180(6) from agreeing to the division of moneys received for probation supervision services.(2) For the purposes of this section the))The administrative office of the courts shall define a probation department and adopt rules for the qualifications of probation officers based on occupational and educational requirements developed by an oversight committee. This oversight committee shall include a representative from the district and municipal court judges' association, the misdemeanant corrections association, the administrative office of the courts, and associations of cities and counties. The oversight committee shall consider qualifications that provide the training and education necessary to (a) conduct presentencing and postsentencing background investigations, including sentencing recommendations to the court regarding jail terms, alternatives to incarceration, and conditions of release; and (b) provide ongoing supervision and assessment of offenders' needs and the risk they pose to the community.(((3) It shall be the responsibility of the probation services office to implement local procedures approved by the court of limited jurisdiction to ensure collection and payment of such fees into the general fund of the city or county treasury.(4) Revenues raised under this section shall be used to fund programs for probation services and shall be in addition to those funds provided in RCW 3.62.050.(5) Assessments and fees levied upon a probationer under this section must be suspended while the probationer is being supervised by another state under RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult offender supervision.))(2) Probation departments may not levy fees or assessments related to any misdemeanor or felony evaluation or supervision services.Sec. 21. RCW 10.82.070 and 2012 c 136 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All sums of money derived from costs, fines, penalties, and forfeitures imposed or collected, in whole or in part, by a superior court for violation of orders of injunction, mandamus and other like writs, for contempt of court, or for breach of the penal laws shall be paid in cash by the person collecting the same, within twenty days after the collection, to the county treasurer of the county in which the same have accrued.(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the county treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the money received under this section except for certain costs to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund and shall deposit the remainder as provided by law. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions ((under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes))as specifically authorized by statute if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court ((and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel)). Costs or assessments awarded to dedicated accounts, state or local, are not subject to this state allocation or to RCW 7.68.035.(3) All fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended. All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a superior court in cases on appeal from a lower court shall be remitted to the municipal or district court from which the cases were appealed.Sec. 22. RCW 10.101.020 and 1997 c 41 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A determination of indigency shall be made for all persons wishing the appointment of counsel in criminal, juvenile, involuntary commitment, and dependency cases, and any other case where the right to counsel attaches. The court or its designee shall determine whether the person is indigent pursuant to the standards set forth in this chapter.(2) In making the determination of indigency, the court shall also consider the anticipated length and complexity of the proceedings and the usual and customary charges of an attorney in the community for rendering services, and any other circumstances presented to the court which are relevant to the issue of indigency. The appointment of counsel shall not be denied to the person because the person's friends or relatives, other than a spouse who was not the victim of any offense or offenses allegedly committed by the person, have resources adequate to retain counsel, or because the person has posted or is capable of posting bond.(3) The determination of indigency shall be made upon the defendant's initial contact with the court or at the earliest time circumstances permit. The court or its designee shall keep a written record of the determination of indigency. Any information given by the accused under this ((section or sections))chapter shall be confidential and shall not be available for use by the prosecution in the pending case.(4) If a determination of eligibility cannot be made before the time when the first services are to be rendered, the court shall appoint an attorney on a provisional basis. If the court subsequently determines that the person receiving the services is ineligible, the court shall notify the person of the termination of services, subject to court-ordered reinstatement.(5) ((All persons determined to be indigent and able to contribute, shall be required to execute a promissory note at the time counsel is appointed. The person shall be informed whether payment shall be made in the form of a lump sum payment or periodic payments. The payment and payment schedule must be set forth in writing. The person receiving the appointment of counsel shall also sign an affidavit swearing under penalty of perjury that all income and assets reported are complete and accurate. In addition, the person must swear in the affidavit to immediately report any change in financial status to the court.(6))) The office or individual charged by the court to make the determination of indigency shall provide a written report and opinion as to indigency on a form prescribed by the office of public defense, based on information obtained from the defendant and subject to verification. The form shall include information necessary to provide a basis for making a determination with respect to indigency as provided by this chapter.(6) A defendant who is indigent shall not be charged costs or fees for court-appointed counsel.Sec. 23. RCW 35.20.220 and 2018 c 269 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The chief clerk, under the supervision and direction of the court administrator of the municipal court, shall have the custody and care of the books, papers and records of the court. The chief clerk or a deputy shall be present during the session of the court and has the power to swear all witnesses and jurors, administer oaths and affidavits, and take acknowledgments. The chief clerk shall keep the records of the court and shall issue all process under his or her hand and the seal of the court. The chief clerk shall do and perform all things and have the same powers pertaining to the office as the clerks of the superior courts have in their office. He or she shall receive all fines, penalties, and fees of every kind and keep a full, accurate, and detailed account of the same. The chief clerk shall on each day pay into the city treasury all money received for the city during the day previous, with a detailed account of the same, and taking the treasurer's receipt therefor.(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest money received under this section, other than for parking infractions and certain costs to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions ((under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes))as specifically authorized by statute if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court ((and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel)). Money remitted under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the state general fund.(3) The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.(4)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, penalties, fines, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency. Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.(b) As of June 7, 2018, penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs imposed against a defendant in a criminal proceeding shall not accrue interest.(5) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, ((bail forfeitures,)) fees, and costs imposed in civil proceedings shall be split ((twenty-five))25 percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund, ((twenty-five))25 percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, ((twenty-five))25 percent to the city general fund, and ((twenty-five))25 percent to the city general fund to fund local courts.Sec. 24. RCW 36.18.016 and 2022 c 29 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.(2)(a) For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of dissolution or paternity, within the same case as the original action, and any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in any such action, a fee of $36 must be paid.(b) The party filing the first or initial petition for dissolution, legal separation, or declaration concerning the validity of marriage shall pay, at the time and in addition to the filing fee required under RCW 36.18.020, a fee of $54. The clerk of the superior court shall transmit monthly $48 of the $54 fee collected under this subsection to the state treasury for deposit in the domestic violence prevention account. The remaining six dollars shall be retained by the county for the purpose of supporting community-based domestic violence services within the county, except for five percent of the six dollars, which may be retained by the court for administrative purposes. On or before December 15th of each year, the county shall report to the department of social and health services revenues associated with this section and community-based domestic violence services expenditures. The department of social and health services shall develop a reporting form to be utilized by counties for uniform reporting purposes.(3)(((a))) The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil action shall pay, at the time, a fee of $125; if the demand is for a jury of 12, a fee of $250. If, after the party demands a jury of six and pays the required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury of 12, an additional $125 fee will be required of the party demanding the increased number of jurors.(((b) Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of $125 for a jury of six, or $250 for a jury of 12 may be imposed as costs under RCW 10.46.190.))(4) For preparing a certified copy of an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office, for the first page or portion of the first page, a fee of five dollars, and for each additional page or portion of a page, a fee of one dollar must be charged. For authenticating or exemplifying an instrument, a fee of two dollars for each additional seal affixed must be charged. For preparing a copy of an instrument on file or of record in the clerk's office without a seal, a fee of 50 cents per page must be charged. When copying a document without a seal or file that is in an electronic format, a fee of 25 cents per page must be charged. For copies made on a compact disc, an additional fee of $20 for each compact disc must be charged.(5) For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of two dollars must be charged.(6) For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment and for a writ of attachment, a fee of $20 must be charged.(7) For filing a supplemental proceeding, a fee of $20 must be charged.(8) For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in other than civil actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars must be charged.(9) For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a certified copy of letters of administration, letters testamentary, or letters of guardianship, there must be a fee of five dollars.(10) For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may collect an execution fee as authorized by the federal government.(11) For clerk's services such as performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports, and conducting exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee not to exceed $30 per hour.(12) For processing ex parte orders, the clerk may collect a fee of $30.(13) For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be a fee of $10 for each audiotape and $25 for each video or other electronic storage medium.(14) For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW 65.12.780, a fee of $20 must be charged.(15) For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020 and chapter 9.94A RCW, a fee of $200 must be charged. When the extension of judgment is at the request of the clerk, the $200 charge may be imposed as court costs ((under RCW 10.46.190)). This charge may not be imposed in criminal cases except as provided in RCW 6.17.020.(16) A facilitator surcharge of up to $20 must be charged as authorized under RCW 26.12.240.(17) For filing an adjudication claim under RCW 90.03.180, a fee of $25 must be charged.(18) For filing a claim of frivolous lien under RCW 60.04.081 or 60.90.130 or filing an action to release a lien under RCW 60.90.090 and 60.90.140, a fee of $35 must be charged.(19) For preparation of a change of venue, a fee of $20 must be charged by the originating court in addition to the per page charges in subsection (4) of this section.(20) A service fee of five dollars for the first page and one dollar for each additional page must be charged for receiving faxed documents, pursuant to Washington state rules of court, general rule 17.(21) For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of 50 cents per page must be charged.(22) For copies and reports produced at the local level as permitted by RCW 2.68.020 and supreme court policy, a variable fee must be charged.(23) Investment service charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090 must be charged.(24) Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority of local ordinance or policy must be charged.(25) For filing a request for civil arbitration, a filing fee may be assessed against the party filing a statement of arbitrability not to exceed $250 as established by authority of local ordinance. $220 of this charge shall be used to offset the cost of the civil arbitration program. $30 of each fee collected under this subsection must be used for indigent defense services.(26) For filing a request for trial de novo of a civil arbitration award, a fee not to exceed $400 as established by authority of local ordinance must be charged.(27) A public agency may not charge a fee to a law enforcement agency, for preparation, copying, or mailing of certified copies of the judgment and sentence, information, affidavit of probable cause, and/or the notice of requirement to register, of a sex offender convicted in a Washington court, when such records are necessary for risk assessment, preparation of a case for failure to register, or maintenance of a sex offender's registration file.(28) For the filing of a will or codicil under the provisions of chapter 11.12 RCW, a fee of $20 must be charged.(29) A surcharge of up to $20 may be charged in dissolution and legal separation actions as authorized by RCW 26.12.260.The revenue to counties from the fees established in this section shall be deemed to be complete reimbursement from the state for the state's share of benefits paid to the superior court judges of the state prior to July 24, 2005, and no claim shall lie against the state for such benefits.Sec. 25. RCW 36.18.020 and 2025 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Revenue collected under this section is subject to division with the state under RCW 36.18.025 and with the county or regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070, except as provided in subsections (((5)))(6) and (((6)))(7) of this section.(2) Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for their official services:(a) In addition to any other fee required by law, the party filing the first or initial document in any civil action, including, but not limited to an action for restitution, adoption, or change of name, and any party filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in any such civil action, shall pay, at the time the document is filed, a fee of $200 except, in an unlawful detainer action under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the plaintiff shall pay a case initiating filing fee of $45, or in proceedings filed under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory attendance laws where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The $45 filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action shall not include an order to show cause or any other order or judgment except a default order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer action.(b) Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the first or initial document on an appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction or any party on any civil appeal, shall pay, when the document is filed, a fee of $200.(c) For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under RCW 34.05.514 a filing fee of $200.(d) For filing of a petition for an antiharassment protection order under RCW 7.105.100 a filing fee of $53.(e) For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a crime victim under RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of $200.(f) In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings, shall pay at the time of filing the first document therein, a fee of $200.(g) For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate or a petition to admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition objecting to a written agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW 11.96A.220, there shall be paid a fee of $200.(h) ((Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon affirmance of a conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, an adult defendant in a criminal case shall be liable for a fee of two hundred dollars, except this fee shall not be imposed on a defendant who is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3). Upon motion by the defendant, the court may waive or reduce any fee previously imposed under this subsection if the court finds that the defendant is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3).(i))) No fee shall be assessed if an order of dismissal on the clerk's record be filed as provided by rule of the supreme court.(3) No filing fee shall be charged or collected in a criminal case.(4) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and instructional brochures provided under RCW 7.105.115.(((4)))(5) No fee shall be collected when an abstract of judgment is filed by the county clerk of another county for the purposes of collection of legal financial obligations.(((5)))(6)(a) In addition to the fees required to be collected under this section, clerks of the superior courts must collect the following surcharges ((as provided in this subsection (5))) of which 75 percent must be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial stabilization trust account and 25 percent must be retained by the county.(b) On filing fees required to be collected under subsection (2)(b) of this section, a surcharge of $30 must be collected.(c) On all filing fees required to be collected under this section, except for fees required under subsection (2)(b)((,))and (d)((, and (h))) of this section, a surcharge of $40 must be collected.(((6)))(7) On filing fees required to be collected under subsection (2)(a), (b), (c), (e), (f), and (g) of this section, a surcharge of $50 must be collected and $45 of such surcharge must be transmitted by the county treasurer to the state treasurer to be deposited in the following manner: $20 in the Washington state legacy project, state library, and archives account and $25 in the judicial stabilization trust account. The remaining funds must be retained by the county to be used for the county clerk's office operations, including administering the surcharge.Sec. 26. RCW 4.56.110 and 2019 c 371 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Interest on judgments shall accrue as follows:(1) Judgments founded on written contracts, providing for the payment of interest until paid at a specified rate, shall bear interest at the rate specified in the contracts: PROVIDED, That said interest rate is set forth in the judgment.(2) All judgments for unpaid child support that have accrued under a superior court order or an order entered under the administrative procedure act shall bear interest at the rate of twelve percent.(3)(a) Judgments founded on the tortious conduct of a "public agency" as defined in RCW 42.30.020 shall bear interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the equivalent coupon issue yield, as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system, of the average bill rate for twenty-six week treasury bills as determined at the first bill market auction conducted during the calendar month immediately preceding the date of entry. In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered.(b) Except as provided in (a) of this subsection, judgments founded on the tortious conduct of individuals or other entities, whether acting in their personal or representative capacities, shall bear interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the prime rate, as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system on the first business day of the calendar month immediately preceding the date of entry. In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered.(4) Except as provided under subsection (1) of this section, judgments for unpaid private student loan debt, as defined in RCW 6.01.060, shall bear interest from the date of entry at two percentage points above the prime rate, as published by the board of governors of the federal reserve system on the first business day of the calendar month immediately preceding the date of entry.(5) Except as provided under subsection (1) of this section, judgments for unpaid consumer debt, as defined in RCW 6.01.060, shall bear interest from the date of entry at a rate of nine percent.(6) Except as provided under subsections (1) through (5) of this section, judgments shall bear interest from the date of entry at the maximum rate permitted under RCW 19.52.020 on the date of entry thereof. In any case where a court is directed on review to enter judgment on a verdict or in any case where a judgment entered on a verdict is wholly or partly affirmed on review, interest on the judgment or on that portion of the judgment affirmed shall date back to and shall accrue from the date the verdict was rendered. The method for determining an interest rate prescribed by this subsection is also the method for determining the "rate applicable to civil judgments" for purposes of RCW ((10.82.090))10.01.090.Sec. 27. RCW 7.68.035 and 2023 c 449 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, when any adult person is found guilty in any superior court of having committed a crime, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, there shall be imposed by the court upon such convicted person a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be five hundred dollars for each case or cause of action that includes one or more convictions of a felony or gross misdemeanor and two hundred fifty dollars for any case or cause of action that includes convictions of only one or more misdemeanors.(2) The assessment imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to motor vehicle crimes defined in Title 46 RCW except those defined in the following sections: RCW 46.61.520, 46.61.522, 46.61.024, 46.52.090, 46.70.140, 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.52.101, 46.20.410, 46.52.020, 46.10.495, 46.09.480, 46.61.5249, 46.61.525, 46.61.685, 46.61.530, 46.61.500, 46.61.015, 46.52.010, 46.44.180, 46.10.490(2), and 46.09.470(2).(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, when any adult person accused of having committed a crime posts bail in superior court pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10.19 RCW and such bail is forfeited, there shall be deducted from the proceeds of such forfeited bail a penalty assessment, in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed by law, equal to the assessment which would be applicable under subsection (1) of this section if the person had been convicted of the crime.(4) The court shall not impose the penalty assessment under this section if the court finds that the defendant, at the time of sentencing, is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act.(5) Upon motion by a defendant, the court shall waive any crime victim penalty assessment imposed prior to July 1, 2023, if:(a) The person was a juvenile at the time the penalty assessment was imposed; or(b) The person does not have the ability to pay the penalty assessment. A person does not have the ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act.(6) Such penalty assessments shall be paid by the clerk of the superior court to the county treasurer. Each county shall deposit one hundred percent of the money it receives per case or cause of action under subsection (1) of this section, not less than one and seventy-five one-hundredths percent of the remaining money it retains under RCW 10.82.070 and the money it retains under chapter 3.62 RCW, and all money it receives under subsection (9) of this section into a fund maintained exclusively for the support of comprehensive programs to encourage and facilitate testimony by the victims of crimes and witnesses to crimes. A program shall be considered "comprehensive" only after approval of the department upon application by the county prosecuting attorney. The department shall approve as comprehensive only programs which:(a) Provide comprehensive services to victims and witnesses of all types of crime with particular emphasis on serious crimes against persons and property. It is the intent of the legislature to make funds available only to programs which do not restrict services to victims or witnesses of a particular type or types of crime and that such funds supplement, not supplant, existing local funding levels;(b) Are administered by the county prosecuting attorney either directly through the prosecuting attorney's office or by contract between the county and agencies providing services to victims of crime;(c) Make a reasonable effort to inform the known victim or his or her surviving dependents of the existence of this chapter and the procedure for making application for benefits;(d) Assist victims in the restitution and adjudication process; and(e) Assist victims of violent crimes in the preparation and presentation of their claims to the department of labor and industries under this chapter.Before a program in any county west of the Cascade mountains is submitted to the department for approval, it shall be submitted for review and comment to each city within the county with a population of more than one hundred fifty thousand. The department will consider if the county's proposed comprehensive plan meets the needs of crime victims in cases adjudicated in municipal, district or superior courts and of crime victims located within the city and county.(7) Upon submission to the department of a letter of intent to adopt a comprehensive program, the prosecuting attorney shall retain the money deposited by the county under subsection (6) of this section until such time as the county prosecuting attorney has obtained approval of a program from the department. Approval of the comprehensive plan by the department must be obtained within one year of the date of the letter of intent to adopt a comprehensive program. The county prosecuting attorney shall not make any expenditures from the money deposited under subsection (6) of this section until approval of a comprehensive plan by the department. If a county prosecuting attorney has failed to obtain approval of a program from the department under subsection (6) of this section or failed to obtain approval of a comprehensive program within one year after submission of a letter of intent under this section, the county treasurer shall monthly transmit one hundred percent of the money deposited by the county under subsection (6) of this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.(8) County prosecuting attorneys are responsible to make every reasonable effort to insure that the penalty assessments of this chapter are imposed and collected.(9) Every city and town shall transmit monthly one and seventy-five one-hundredths percent of all money, other than money received for parking infractions, retained under RCW 3.50.100 and 35.20.220 to the county treasurer for deposit as provided in subsection (6) of this section.Sec. 28. RCW 9.92.070 and 2022 c 260 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:Hereafter whenever any judge of any superior court or a district or municipal judge shall sentence any person to pay any fines, penalties, assessments, fees, and costs, the judge may, in the judge's discretion, provide that such fines, penalties, assessments, fees, and costs may be paid in certain designated installments, or within certain designated period or periods. If the court finds that the defendant is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act, the court shall allow for payment in certain designated installments or within certain designated periods. If such fines, penalties, assessments, fees, and costs shall be paid by the defendant in accordance with such order no commitment or imprisonment of the defendant shall be made for failure to pay such fine or costs. PROVIDED, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any sentence given for the violation of any of the liquor laws of this state.Sec. 29. RCW 9.94A.6333 and 2023 c 449 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence, and the offender is not being supervised by the department, the court may modify its order of judgment and sentence and impose further punishment in accordance with this section.(2) If an offender fails to comply with any of the nonfinancial conditions or requirements of a sentence the following provisions apply:(a) The court, upon the motion of the state, or upon its own motion, shall require the offender to show cause why the offender should not be punished for the noncompliance. The court may issue a summons or a warrant of arrest for the offender's appearance;(b) The state has the burden of showing noncompliance by a preponderance of the evidence;(c) If the court finds that a violation has been proved, it may impose the sanctions specified in RCW 9.94A.633(1). Alternatively, the court may:(i) Convert a term of partial confinement to total confinement; or(ii) Convert community restitution obligation to total or partial confinement;(d) If the court finds that the violation was not willful, the court may modify its previous order regarding community restitution obligations; and(e) If the violation involves a failure to undergo or comply with a mental health status evaluation and/or outpatient mental health treatment, the court shall seek a recommendation from the treatment provider or proposed treatment provider. Enforcement of orders concerning outpatient mental health treatment must reflect the availability of treatment and must pursue the least restrictive means of promoting participation in treatment. If the offender's failure to receive care essential for health and safety presents a risk of serious physical harm or probable harmful consequences, the civil detention and commitment procedures of chapter 71.05 RCW shall be considered in preference to incarceration in a local or state correctional facility.(3) If an offender fails to pay legal financial obligations as a requirement of a sentence the following provisions apply:(a) The court, upon the motion of the state, or upon its own motion, shall require the offender to show cause why the offender should not be punished for the noncompliance. The court may issue a summons or a warrant of arrest for the offender's appearance;(b) The state has the burden of showing noncompliance by a preponderance of the evidence;(c) The court may not sanction the offender for failure to pay legal financial obligations unless the court finds, after a hearing and on the record, that the failure to pay is willful. A failure to pay is willful if the offender has the current ability to pay but refuses to do so.Â In determining whether the offender has the current ability to pay, the court shall inquire into and consider: (i) The offender's income and assets; (ii) the offender's basic living costs as defined by RCW 10.101.010 and other liabilities including child support and other legal financial obligations; and (iii) the offender's bona fide efforts to acquire additional resources. An offender who is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act is presumed to lack the current ability to pay;(d) If the court determines that the offender is homeless or a person who is mentally ill, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, failure to pay a legal financial obligation is not willful noncompliance and shall not subject the offender to penalties;(e) If the court finds that a failure to pay is willful noncompliance, it may impose the sanctions specified in RCW 9.94A.633(1); and(f) If the court finds that the violation was not willful, the court may, and if the court finds that the defendant is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act, the court shall modify the terms of payment of the legal financial obligations, reduce or waive nonrestitution legal financial obligations, or convert nonrestitution legal financial obligations to community restitution hours, if the jurisdiction operates a community restitution program, at the rate of no less than the state minimum wage established in RCW 49.46.020 for each hour of community restitution.(4) Any time served in confinement awaiting a hearing on noncompliance shall be credited against any confinement ordered by the court.(5) Nothing in this section prohibits the filing of escape charges if appropriate.Sec. 30. RCW 9.94B.040 and 2023 c 449 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence, the court may modify its order of judgment and sentence and impose further punishment in accordance with this section.(2) In cases where conditions from a second or later sentence of community supervision begin prior to the term of the second or later sentence, the court shall treat a violation of such conditions as a violation of the sentence of community supervision currently being served.(3) If an offender fails to comply with any of the nonfinancial requirements or conditions of a sentence the following provisions apply:(a)(i) Following the violation, if the offender and the department make a stipulated agreement, the department may impose sanctions such as work release, home detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community restitution, inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, jail time, or other sanctions available in the community.(ii) Within 72 hours of signing the stipulated agreement, the department shall submit a report to the court and the prosecuting attorney outlining the violation or violations, and sanctions imposed. Within 15 days of receipt of the report, if the court is not satisfied with the sanctions, the court may schedule a hearing and may modify the department's sanctions. If this occurs, the offender may withdraw from the stipulated agreement.(iii) If the offender fails to comply with the sanction administratively imposed by the department, the court may take action regarding the original noncompliance. Offender failure to comply with the sanction administratively imposed by the department may be considered an additional violation;(b) In the absence of a stipulated agreement, or where the court is not satisfied with the department's sanctions as provided in (a) of this subsection, the court, upon the motion of the state, or upon its own motion, shall require the offender to show cause why the offender should not be punished for the noncompliance. The court may issue a summons or a warrant of arrest for the offender's appearance;(c) The state has the burden of showing noncompliance by a preponderance of the evidence. If the court finds that the violation has occurred, it may order the offender to be confined for a period not to exceed 60 days for each violation, and may (i) convert a term of partial confinement to total confinement, (ii) convert community restitution obligation to total or partial confinement, or (iii) order one or more of the penalties authorized in (a)(i) of this subsection. Any time served in confinement awaiting a hearing on noncompliance shall be credited against any confinement order by the court;(d) If the court finds that the violation was not willful, the court may modify its previous order regarding community restitution obligations; and(e) If the violation involves a failure to undergo or comply with mental status evaluation and/or outpatient mental health treatment, the community corrections officer shall consult with the treatment provider or proposed treatment provider. Enforcement of orders concerning outpatient mental health treatment must reflect the availability of treatment and must pursue the least restrictive means of promoting participation in treatment. If the offender's failure to receive care essential for health and safety presents a risk of serious physical harm or probable harmful consequences, the civil detention and commitment procedures of chapter 71.05 RCW shall be considered in preference to incarceration in a local or state correctional facility.(4) If the violation involves failure to pay legal financial obligations, the following provisions apply:(a) The department and the offender may enter into a stipulated agreement that the failure to pay was willful noncompliance, according to the provisions and requirements of subsection (3)(a) of this section;(b) In the absence of a stipulated agreement, or where the court is not satisfied with the department's sanctions as provided in a stipulated agreement under (a) of this subsection, the court, upon the motion of the state, or upon its own motion, shall require the offender to show cause why the offender should not be punished for the noncompliance. The court may issue a summons or a warrant of arrest for the offender's appearance;(c) The state has the burden of showing noncompliance by a preponderance of the evidence. The court may not sanction the offender for failure to pay legal financial obligations unless the court finds, after a hearing and on the record, that the failure to pay is willful. A failure to pay is willful if the offender has the current ability to pay but refuses to do so. In determining whether the offender has the current ability to pay, the court shall inquire into and consider: (i) The offender's income and assets; (ii) the offender's basic living costs as defined by RCW 10.101.010 and other liabilities including child support and other legal financial obligations; and (iii) the offender's bona fide efforts to acquire additional resources. An offender who is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act is presumed to lack the current ability to pay;(d) If the court determines that the offender is homeless or a person who is mentally ill, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, failure to pay a legal financial obligation is not willful noncompliance and shall not subject the offender to penalties;(e) If the court finds that the failure to pay is willful noncompliance, the court may order the offender to be confined for a period not to exceed 60 days for each violation or order one or more of the penalties authorized in subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section; and(f) If the court finds that the violation was not willful, the court may, and if the court finds that the defendant is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act, the court shall modify the terms of payment of the legal financial obligations, reduce or waive nonrestitution legal financial obligations, or convert nonrestitution legal financial obligations to community restitution hours, if the jurisdiction operates a community restitution program, at the rate of no less than the state minimum wage established in RCW 49.46.020 for each hour of community restitution.(5) The community corrections officer may obtain information from the offender's mental health treatment provider on the offender's status with respect to evaluation, application for services, registration for services, and compliance with the supervision plan, without the offender's consent, as described under RCW 71.05.630.(6) An offender under community placement or community supervision who is civilly detained under chapter 71.05 RCW, and subsequently discharged or conditionally released to the community, shall be under the supervision of the department of corrections for the duration of his or her period of community placement or community supervision. During any period of inpatient mental health treatment that falls within the period of community placement or community supervision, the inpatient treatment provider and the supervising community corrections officer shall notify each other about the offender's discharge, release, and legal status, and shall share other relevant information.(7) Nothing in this section prohibits the filing of escape charges if appropriate.Sec. 31. RCW 10.01.090 and 2019 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An entity convicted of an offense may be ordered to pay legal financial obligations, including restitution, crime victims' assessments, costs, fines, penalties, and other assessments authorized or required by law. Legal financial obligations imposed upon an entity shall be entered and docketed by the clerk, or district or municipal court as a judgment against the entity, and it shall be of the same force and effect and be enforced against such entity in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. Notwithstanding any other provisions pertaining to legal financial obligations, all legal financial obligations imposed in a judgment against an entity under this section bear interest from the date of the judgment until payment at the rate applicable to civil judgments under RCW 4.56.110. When an entity is ordered to pay restitution, payments to the clerk must be distributed to restitution prior to all other obligations.(2) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (1) of this section, payments on legal financial obligations must be collected and distributed according to the requirements under RCW 3.50.100, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, 9.92.070, 9.94A.760, ((10.01.160,)) 10.01.170, 10.01.180, ((10.46.190, 10.64.015, 10.73.160, 10.82.090,)) 35.20.220, and any other sections applicable to legal financial obligations imposed as a result of a criminal conviction.(3) For the purposes of this section, "entity" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 9A.08.030.Sec. 32. RCW 10.01.180 and 2023 c 449 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A defendant sentenced to pay any fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or costs who willfully defaults in the payment thereof or of any installment is in contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. The court may issue a warrant of arrest for his or her appearance.(2) When any fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or assessment of costs is imposed on a corporation or unincorporated association, it is the duty of the person authorized to make disbursement from the assets of the corporation or association to pay the obligation from those assets, and his or her failure to do so may be held to be contempt.(3)(a) The court shall not sanction a defendant for contempt based on failure to pay fines, penalties, assessments, fees, or costs unless the court finds, after a hearing and on the record, that the failure to pay is willful. A failure to pay is willful if the defendant has the current ability to pay but refuses to do so.(b) In determining whether the defendant has the current ability to pay, the court shall inquire into and consider: (i) The defendant's income and assets; (ii) the defendant's basic living costs as defined by RCW 10.101.010 and other liabilities including child support and other legal financial obligations; and (iii) the defendant's bona fide efforts to acquire additional resources. A defendant who is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act is presumed to lack the current ability to pay.(c) If the court determines that the defendant is homeless or a person who is mentally ill, as defined in RCW 71.24.025, failure to pay a legal financial obligation is not willful contempt and shall not subject the defendant to penalties.(4) If a term of imprisonment for contempt for nonpayment of any fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or costs is ordered, the term of imprisonment shall be set forth in the commitment order, and shall not exceed one day for each $25 of the amount ordered, 30 days if the amount ordered of costs was imposed upon conviction of a violation or misdemeanor, or one year in any other case, whichever is the shorter period. A person committed for nonpayment of any fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or costs shall be given credit toward payment for each day of imprisonment at the rate specified in the commitment order.(5) If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the default in the payment of any fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or costs is not willful contempt, the court may, and if the defendant is indigent as defined in ((RCW 10.01.160(3)))section 14 of this act, the court shall enter an order: (a) Allowing the defendant additional time for payment; (b) reducing the amount thereof or of each installment; (c) revoking the fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or costs or the unpaid portion thereof in whole or in part; or (d) converting the unpaid fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or costs to community restitution hours, if the jurisdiction operates a community restitution program, at the rate of no less than the state minimum wage established in RCW 49.46.020 for each hour of community restitution.(6) A default in the payment of any fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or costs or any installment thereof may be collected by any means authorized by law for the enforcement of a judgment. The levy of execution for the collection of any fine, penalty, assessment, fee, or costs shall not discharge a defendant committed to imprisonment for contempt until the amount has actually been collected.Sec. 33. RCW 43.79.505 and 2022 c 297 s 956 are each amended to read as follows:The judicial stabilization trust account is created within the state treasury, subject to appropriation. All receipts from the surcharges authorized by RCW 3.62.060(2), 12.40.020, 36.18.018(4), and 36.18.020(((5)))(6) shall be deposited in this account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.Expenditures from the account may be used only for the support of judicial branch agencies and, for the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, for expenditures to address state and local costs related to the State v. Blake decision.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 34. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 3.62.085 (Fee for conviction or plea of guilty) and 2022 c 260 s 16, 2018 c 269 s 16, & 2005 c 457 s 10;(2) RCW 10.46.190 (Liability of convicted person for costsâJury fee) and 2022 c 260 s 20, 2018 c 269 s 9, 2005 c 457 s 12, 1977 ex.s. c 248 s 1, 1977 ex.s. c 53 s 1, 1961 c 304 s 8, Code 1881 s 2105, & 1869 p 418 s 3;(3) RCW 10.73.160 (Court fees and costs) and 2022 c 260 s 10, 2018 c 269 s 12, 2015 c 265 s 22, & 1995 c 275 s 3;(4) RCW 10.82.090 (Interest on judgmentsâDisposition of nonrestitution interest) and 2023 c 449 s 13, 2022 c 260 s 12, 2018 c 269 s 1, 2015 c 265 s 23, 2011 c 106 s 2, 2009 c 479 s 14, 2004 c 121 s 1, 1995 c 291 s 7, & 1989 c 276 s 3; and(5) RCW 70.48.390 (Fee payable by person being booked) and 2003 c 99 s 1 & 1999 c 325 s 3.--- END ---